Washington statutes.
RCW 4.20.046

Survival of actions.

(1) All causes of action by a person or persons against another person or persons shall survive to the personal representatives of the former and against the personal representatives of the latter, whether such actions arise on contract or otherwise, and whether or not such actions would have survived at the common law or prior to the date of enactment of this section.

(2) In addition to recovering economic losses on behalf of the decedent's estate, the personal representative is only entitled to recover noneconomic damages for pain and suffering, anxiety, emotional distress, or humiliation personal to and suffered by the deceased on behalf of those beneficiaries enumerated in RCW 4.20.020 in such amounts as determined by a trier of fact to be just under all the circumstances of the case. Damages under this section are recoverable regardless of whether or not the death was occasioned by the injury that is the basis for the action.

(3) The liability of property of spouses or domestic partners held by them as community property and subject to execution in satisfaction of a claim enforceable against such property so held shall not be affected by the death of either or both spouses or either or both domestic partners; and a cause of action shall remain an asset as though both claiming spouses or both claiming domestic partners continued to live despite the death of either or both claiming spouses or both claiming domestic partners.

(4) Where death or an injury to person or property, resulting from a wrongful act, neglect or default, occurs simultaneously with or after the death of a person who would have been liable therefor if his or her death had not occurred simultaneously with such death or injury or had not intervened between the wrongful act, neglect or default and the resulting death or injury, an action to recover damages for such death or injury may be maintained against the personal representative of such person.

[ 2019 c 159 s 3; 2008 c 6 s 409; 1993 c 44 s 1; 1961 c 137 s 1.]

NOTES:

Retroactive application—2019 c 159: See note following RCW 4.20.010.

Part headings not law—Severability—2008 c 6: See RCW 26.60.900 and 26.60.901.